it: Bocchino per clarinetto, suono previsto: Bilanciato; Brillante; Scuro; Centrato; Potente/Pieno; Caldo; Altro
ru: Целевой тембр мундштука кларнета: Сбалансированный; Яркий; Темный; Сфокусированный; Мощный / пробивной; Теплый; Другой
vi: Âm thanh mong muốn của ống ngậm kèn clarinet: Cân bằng; Sáng; Trầm; Tập trung; Mạnh mẽ/vang xa; Ấm; Khác
lt-LT: Numatytas klarneto kandiklio tonas: Subalansuotas; Šviesus; Tamsus; Fokusuotas; Galingas / projektuojantis; Šiltas; Kita
nl: Klarinetmondstuk beoogde klank: Gebalanceerd; Helder; Donker; Gefocust; Krachtig/projecterend; Warm; Anders
es: Tono deseado de la boquilla del clarinete: Equilibrado; Brillante; Oscuro; Centrado; Potente/de proyección; Cálido; Otro
zh-TW: 單簧管吹嘴預期音色: 平衡; 明亮; 深沉; 集中; 充滿力量/具穿透力; 溫暖; 其他
pt-BR: Tom pretendido para a boquilha do clarinete: Equilibrado; Brilhante; Escuro; Focado; Potente/com projeção; Quente; Outro
fr: Sonorité prévue du bec de clarinette: Équilibré; Brillant; Sombre; Centré; Puissant/projeté; Chaud; Autre
sk-SK: Zamýšľaný tón náustku pre klarinet: Vyvážený; Jasný; Temný; Sústredený; Silný/priebojný; Teplý; Iné
bg-BG: Предназначен тон на мундщука за кларинет: Балансиран; Ярък; Тъмен; Фокусиран; Мощен/пробивен; Топъл; Друго
sl-SI: Želeni ton ustnika za klarinet: Uravnotežen; Svetel; Temen; Usmerjen; Močan/prodoren; Topel; Drugo
hu: Klarinétfúvóka tervezett hangja: Kiegyensúlyozott; Fényes; Sötét; Fókuszált; Erőteljes/átható; Meleg; Egyéb
th: ลักษณะเสียงที่คาดหวังของปากเป่าคลาริเน็ต: สมดุล; สดใส; ทุ้ม; โฟกัส; ทรงพลัง/กระจายเสียงได้ดี; อบอุ่น; อื่นๆ
el: Επιστόμιο κλαρινέτου που προορίζεται για τόνο: Ισορροπημένος; Φωτεινός; Σκοτεινός; Εστιασμένος; Ισχυρός/με προβολή; Ζεστός; Άλλος
ro-RO: Tonul dorit al muștiucului de clarinet: Echilibrat; Strălucitor; Închis; Concentrat; Puternic/cu proiecție; Cald; Altele
fi: Klarinetin suukappaleen tarkoitettu sävy: Tasapainoinen; Kirkas; Tumma; Keskitetty; Voimakas/kantava; Lämmin; Muu
da: Klarinetmundstykkes tiltænkte klang: Balanceret; Lys; Mørk; Fokuseret; Kraftfuld/projicerende; Varm; Andet
de: Beabsichtigter Klang des Klarinettenmundstücks: Ausgewogen; Hell; Dunkel; Fokussiert; Kraftvoll/tragfähig; Warm; Sonstige
hr-HR: Namijenjeni ton usnika za klarinet: Uravnotežen; Svijetao; Taman; Fokusiran; Snažan / koji se projicira; Topao; Ostalo
ko: 클라리넷 마우스피스 의도 음색: 균형 잡힘; 밝음; 어두움; 집중됨; 파워풀함/뻗어나감; 따뜻함; 기타
cs: Zamýšlený tón náustku pro klarinet: Vyvážený; Jasný; Temný; Zaměřený; Silný / nosný; Teplý; Jiné
ja: クラリネットのマウスピースが意図する音色: バランス; ブライト; ダーク; フォーカス; パワフル/プロジェクティング; ウォーム; その他
pt-PT: Boquilha de clarinete - timbre pretendido: Equilibrado; Brilhante; Escuro; Focado; Poderoso/projetado; Quente; Outro
zh-CN: 单簧管笛头目标音色: 均衡; 明亮; 低沉; 集中; 强劲/具穿透力; 温暖; 其他
sv: Avsedd ton för klarinettmunstycket: Balanserad; Ljus; Mörk; Fokuserad; Kraftfull/projicerande; Varm; Annan
tr: Klarnet beki hedef ton karakteri: Dengeli; Parlak; Karanlık; Odaklı; Güçlü/yansıtan; Sıcak; Diğer
en: Clarinet mouthpiece intended tone: Balanced; Bright; Dark; Focused; Powerful/projecting; Warm; Other
pl: Docelowy ton ustnika klarnetu: Zrównoważony; Jasny; Ciemny; Skoncentrowany; Mocny / nośny; Ciepły; Inny
nb: Klarinettmunnstykkets beregnede tone: Balansert; Lys; Mørk; Fokusert; Kraftig / projiserende; Varm; Annen